District of Columbia statutes.
5-119.11

Immunity from damages to property; exception; “gross negligence” defined.

Neither the government of the District of Columbia nor any officer or employee thereof shall be liable for damage to any property resulting from the removal of such property from public space, or the transportation of such property into the custody of the Property Clerk, Metropolitan Police Department, nor for damage to any such property while such property is in the custody of the Property Clerk, Metropolitan Police Department, when such custody is maintained pursuant to the requirements of law, except that the government of the District of Columbia or any such officer or employee may be liable for damage to such property as a result of gross negligence in the removal, transportation, or storage of such property; provided, that should a judgment be entered for the District of Columbia against any commercial warehouseman or garagekeeper for damage to such property in his care, recovery on such judgment, less all administrative expenses and court costs to the District of Columbia involved in such litigation, shall be paid by the District of Columbia to the owner of the damaged property as determined by the Property Clerk. For the purpose of this section, the term “gross negligence” means a willful intent to injure property, or a reckless or wanton disregard of the rights of another in his property.

History

Sept. 25, 1962, 76 Stat. 591, Pub. L. 87-691, § 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-162.
1973 Ed., § 4-160a.